Hawaii statutes.
§436B-14.7 Licensure by
endorsement or licensure by reciprocity; initial acceptance by affidavit;
temporary license; military spouse. (a) If a military spouse holds a
current license in another state, district, or territory of the United States
with licensure requirements that the licensing authority determines are
equivalent to or exceed those established by the licensing authority of this
State, that military spouse shall receive a license pursuant to applicable
statutes or requirements of the licensing authority of this State regarding
licensure by endorsement or licensure by reciprocity; provided that the
military spouse:

(1) Has not committed an act in any jurisdiction that
would have constituted grounds for the limitation, suspension, or revocation of
a license; has never been censured or had other disciplinary action taken; has
not had an application for licensure denied; or has not refused to practice a
profession or vocation for which the military spouse seeks licensure;

(2) Has not been disciplined by a licensing or
credentialing entity in another jurisdiction; is not the subject of an
unresolved complaint, review procedure, or disciplinary proceeding conducted by
a licensing or credentialing entity in another jurisdiction; and has not surrendered
membership on any professional staff in any professional association, society,
or faculty for another state or licensing jurisdiction while under
investigation or to avoid adverse action for acts or conduct similar to acts or
conduct which would constitute grounds for disciplinary action in this State;

(3) Pays any fees required by the licensing authority
of this State;

(4) Submits with the application a signed affidavit
stating that application information, including necessary prior employment
history, is true and accurate. Upon receiving the affidavit, if the licensing
authority issues the license to the military spouse, the licensing authority
may revoke the license at any time if the information provided in the
application is found to be false; and

(5) Is the spouse of a military member who is a
member in good standing in the active or a reserve component of any of the
armed forces of the United States and the military member has orders issued by
the appropriate agencies of the armed forces to be stationed in Hawaii for a
duration of at least one year.

(b) The licensing authority shall issue to the
military spouse a temporary license to allow the military spouse to perform
specified services, under the supervision of a professional licensed by this
State if appropriate, while completing any requirements necessary for licensure
in this State; provided that a temporary license shall only be issued in those
professions where credentials, experience, or passage of a national exam is
substantially equivalent to or exceed those established by the licensing
authority of this State.

(c) The licensing authority shall expedite
consideration of the application and issuance of a license by endorsement,
license by reciprocity, or temporary license to a military spouse who meets the
requirements of this section.

(d) A license by endorsement or reciprocity
issued under subsection (a) shall be valid for the same period of time as a
license issued pursuant to the requirements of title 25 for the particular
profession; provided that the total time period that a military spouse holds a
license issued by endorsement or reciprocity under subsection (a) shall not
exceed five years in the aggregate. [L 2012, c 247, pt of §1; am L 2013, c 185,
§1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next